Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.84.730

Divulging ballot count.

(1) In any location in which ballots are counted, no person authorized by law to be present while votes are being counted may divulge any results of the count of the ballots at any time prior to 8:00 p.m. on the day of the primary or special or general election.

(2) A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor punishable to the same extent as a gross misdemeanor that is punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

[ 2011 c 10 s 77; 2003 c 111 s 2139. Prior: 1991 c 81 s 15; 1990 c 59 s 55; 1977 ex.s. c 361 s 85; 1965 c 9 s 29.54.035; prior: 1955 c 148 s 6. Formerly RCW 29.85.225, 29.54.035.]

NOTES:

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.

Effective date—1991 c 81: See note following RCW 29A.84.540.

Intent—Effective date—1990 c 59: See notes following RCW 29A.04.013.

Effective date—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 361: See notes following RCW 29A.16.040.

Divulging returns in voting device precincts: RCW 29A.60.120.